New Jersey, session 222, A5424.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a. The superintendent of schools of each school district, or the superintendent's designee, shall annually review the districts policy prohibiting harassment, intimidation, or bullying required pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2002, c.83 (C.18A:37-15) to verify that the policy includes a procedure for reporting an act of harassment, intimidation, or bullying anonymously in accordance with paragraph (5) of subsection b. of section 3 of P.L.2002, c.83 (C.18A:37-15). b. The superintendent, or the superintendents designee, shall annually provide a statement of assurance to the Department of Education verifying that the school districts policy includes a procedure for anonymous reporting. c. The State Board of Examiners shall revoke the certificate of a superintendent, or the superintendents designee, who: (1) falsifies the statement of assurance required pursuant to subsection b. of this section if the State Board of Examiners determines the information was intentionally falsified; or (2) interferes with or otherwise attempts to dissuade any person with credible information from reporting, or planning to report, an act of harassment, intimidation, or bullying. The State Board of Examiners shall comply with the procedures established in the rules and regulations promulgated by the State Board of Education when revoking a certificate pursuant to this subsection. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.